Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1416.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1210.229-6,


is amended to read as follows:


Section 1210.229-6. A. This act shall be known and may be


cited as the “Teaching Honesty, Respect, Integrity, Virtue, and


Excellence (THRIVE) Act”.


B. The board of education of every school district in this


state may State Department of Education shall develop and implement


a comprehensive program for of positive character education in any


single grade or combination of traits and personal skills education


as part of the subject matter standards adopted by the State Board


of Education for grades, prekindergarten through twelfth twelve


pursuant to Sections 11-103.6 and 11-103.7 of this title. The


positive character traits and personal skills education program


shall focus on development of character traits in students. The


program of character education may program shall include, but shall


not be limited to, the voluntary reciting of the Pledge of


Allegiance to the flag of the United States of America and consist


exclusively of instruction in the value of finishing high school,


working full-time, getting married before having children, and


instruction in the following character traits and fundamental values


deeply rooted in the history and tradition of the United States:



Req. No. 2558 Page 2


1. Trustworthiness including honesty, reliability, punctuality,


and loyalty;


2. Responsibility including hard work, accountability,


diligence, good judgment, perseverance, and self-control;


3. Care for family including parents, siblings, and a future


spouse and children;


4. Kindness and generosity toward others;


5. Respect and care for human life;


6. Respect for parental authority;


7. Respect for parents’ obligations to their children;


8. Respect for the property of other people;


9. Respect for legitimate authority and law;


10. Respect for patriotism, service to the community, and


concern for the common good;


11. Respect for religious faith, morality, wisdom, and


knowledge;


12. Respect for lifelong marriage, sexual fidelity within


marriage, and sexual abstinence outside of marriage;


13. Gratitude;


14. Charity; and


15. Courage.


B. The C. Prior to the beginning of the 2026-2027 school year,


the State Department of Education shall develop and make available



Req. No. 2558 Page 3


to all public school districts and public charter schools through an


Internet website, the following:


1. Technical assistance upon request of a public school


district or public charter school;


2. A list of approved research-based positive character traits


and personal skills education programs, curricula, and materials


that meet the requirements of this section which may be used by


public school districts and public charter schools;


3. A positive character traits and personal skills education


honor roll that will recognize public school districts and public


charter schools that have successfully implemented a comprehensive


school-district-wide program of positive character traits and


personal skills education and will highlight the positive impacts


the program has had on each public school or, public school


district, or public charter school; and


4. A positive character traits and personal skills education


reading list of books that may include, but is not limited to, books


that illustrate models of good character one or more of the


character traits and personal skills set forth in subsection B of


this section and books that relate to the development of good such


positive character traits and personal skills that may be used by


public schools in a character education program.


The State Department of Education shall not include any programs,


curricula, or materials in the list approved pursuant to this

Req. No. 2558 Page 4


subsection that contradict or undermine respect for the character


traits and personal skills required to be taught pursuant to this


section. The Department’s approval of programs, curricula, or


materials pursuant to this subsection shall be ministerial only and


not discretionary. Public school districts and public charter


schools may only satisfy the requirements of this section by


adopting programs, curricula, or materials from the list approved


pursuant to this subsection.


C. Subject to the availability of funding, the State Board of


Education may award grants to ten school districts for the


establishment of pilot projects which align character education with


the state curriculum in reading, mathematics, science or social


studies and demonstrate how character education teaches life skills


that lead to career readiness. The amount of each grant shall be


One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). The projects shall be innovative


programs that will serve as models for other school districts.


Funding may cover the cost of purchasing curriculum, materials, or


training teachers. The Board shall determine pilot project criteria


and establish a process for the consideration of proposals. The


proposals for pilot projects shall be considered on a statewide


competitive basis. The Board shall promulgate rules for the


operation of the projects


D. The board of education of each public school district and


the governing body of each public charter school shall adopt the

Req. No. 2558 Page 5


positive character traits and personal skills education program


prescribed by this section and adopt a process to issue a public


notice of implementation of the positive character traits and


personal skills education program required by this section, to make


curricula and materials available for public inspection, and to


provide parents and legal guardians a means to opt their child out


of participation in the positive character traits and personal


skills education program. The parent or legal guardian of a student


who does not want his or her child to participate in the program may


provide written notification to the public school district or public


charter school that the child is opting out of the program. No


student whose parent or legal guardian elects to opt the student out


of the program shall be required to participate in the program.


E. No later than sixty (60) days following the beginning of the


2027-2028 school year, and no later than sixty (60) days following


the beginning of each school year thereafter, the State Department


of Education shall publish on its website and electronically submit


a report to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate,


the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairs of the


committees with responsibility over common education in both houses


of the Legislature. The report shall include:


1. The total number and names of public school districts and


public charter schools that have implemented the positive character



Req. No. 2558 Page 6


traits and personal skills education program required by this


section;


2. The total number and names of public school districts and


public charter schools that have not implemented the positive


character traits and personal skills education program required by


this section and the reasons given for not complying with the


provisions of this section; and


3. Actions taken by the Department to bring public school


districts and public charter schools reported pursuant to paragraph


of this subsection into compliance with the provisions of this


section.


F. The State Department of Education, public school districts,


and public charter schools may accept federal or private funds to


implement the provisions of this section.


G. 1. Prior to the beginning of the 2026-2027 school year,


each public school district board of education and governing body of


a public charter school shall adopt a policy to make school premises


available for students to participate in voluntary after-school


instruction programs provided by third parties that instruct


students in the philosophical, historical, traditional, or religious


justifications for the positive character traits and personal skills


education program required by this section.


2. Written consent from a parent or legal guardian shall be


required to allow a student to participate in such instruction

Req. No. 2558 Page 7


programs. Each public school district board of education and


governing body of a public charter school shall provide prior


written notification to the parent or legal guardian of a student


regarding the availability of the instruction program available


pursuant to this subsection, which shall include information to


parents and legal guardians on how to provide written consent for


student participation. Consent for a student’s participation may be


revoked at any time by the student or his or her parent or legal


guardian upon written notice to the public school district or public


charter school.


3. The State Board of Education shall approve and publish on


the State Department of Education’s website a list of after-school


instruction programs that comply with the provisions of this


subsection. Approval shall not be denied to a program based on its


viewpoint or on the grounds that it contains expression protected by


the Oklahoma Constitution or the United States Constitution.


H. In the event of a conflict between the provisions of this


section and any other provision in the Oklahoma Statutes or an


administrative rule, guidance, or policy, the provisions of this


section shall control.


I. The State Board of Education may promulgate rules to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.



Req. No. 2558 Page 8


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2558 EB 1/5/2026 11:36:22 AM





































Req. No. 2558 Page 9